examples/apertium-hin.hin.dix.xml
	<pardef n="प/ी__vblex_tv">
      <e>       <p><l>िऊँगा</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ियेंगे</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>िएँगे</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>िऊँगी</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ियेंगी</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>िएँगी</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ियेगा</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>िएगा</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ियोगे</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ियेगी</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>िएगी</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ियोगी</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ियेगा</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>िएगा</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ियेंगे</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>िएँगे</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ियेगी</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>िएगी</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ियेंगी</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>िएँगी</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ीनेवाला</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ीनेवाले</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ीनेवाली</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ीनेवाली</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ीना</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ीनी</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ीने</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>िऊँ</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>ियें</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>िएँ</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>िये</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>िए</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>ियें</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>िएँ</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>िये</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>िए</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>ियें</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>िएँ</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>ीजिये</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ीजिए</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ी</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="stem"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ियो</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ीता</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ीतें</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ीती</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ीतीं</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ीकर</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>ीके</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>िया</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>िये</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>िए</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ी</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ी</l><r>ी<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<e lm="पी"><i>प</i><par n="प/ी__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="जी"><i>ज</i><par n="प/ी__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="सी"><i>स</i><par n="प/ी__vblex_tv"/></e>
